Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1182.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 4328. Support of unborn child.(a) Obligations.--A biological mother of an unborn child may commence a support action or proceeding under this chapter for support from the biological father of the unborn child. A court shall order and enforce unborn child support obligations in accordance with the biological mother's requested support and the financial ability of the biological father to pay for the support. The start date for unborn child support obligations shall commence on the date of the first prenatal medical visit of a biological mother by a physician . (b) Paternity.-- A support action or proceeding under this 123456789101112131415161718 chapter to establish the paternity of an unborn child shall require the consent of the biological mother. A court may not order a measure to establish the paternity of an unborn child if the measure poses a risk of harm to the unborn child.(c) Accrual of payments.--A court may order that payments for unborn child support be retroactively collected or awarded, including in the event when paternity is established after the birth of the unborn child.(d) Applicability.--This section shall not apply to a biological father who terminated parental rights before conception of the unborn child for the sole purpose of semen donation with the intended use in an artificial insemination or other fertility treatment of a biological mother . (e) Termination of support.--A court may terminate unborn child support upon the determination by a physician that a biological mother is no longer pregnant or upon the determination by a paternity test that the biological father who is a party in the s upport action or proceeding under this chapter is not the biological father . (f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"A rtificial insemination." The deliberate introduction of sperm into a biological female's uterine cavity for the purpose of achieving pregnancy."Biological father." A male genetic contributor to the creation of an unborn child who inherits the contributor's DNA."Biological mother." A female genetic contributor to the creation of an unborn child who inherits the contributor's DNA."P hysician." An individual licensed to practice medicine in 20250HB1182PN1323 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this Commonwealth. The term includes a medical doctor or doctor of osteopathy."U nborn child." As defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3203 (relating to definitions).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1182PN1323 - 3 - 12345